en: undulate venus, Paratapes undulatus
de: Undulate venus, Paratapes undulatus
fi: mattosimpukka, Paratapes undulatus
fr: undulate venus, Paratapes undulatus
hr: valovita venera
it: vongola del Pacifico, Paratapes undulatus
la: Paratapes undulatus, Paphia undulata
th: หอยลาย, Paratapes undulatus
vi: Sò lụa, Paratapes undulatus
zh: 波纹巴非蛤, 波紋橫簾蛤, Paratapes undulatus

en: clam or mussel
fi: simpukka, simpukat
it: vongole o cozze

en: crustacean, crustaceans
af: Skaaldier
ar: قشريات
az: Xərçəngkimilər
ba: Ҡыҫала
be: ракападобныя, ракообразни
bg: ракообразни
br: Kresteneg
bs: Rakovi
ca: Crustaci, crustacis
cs: korýši
cy: Cramennog
da: krebsdyr
de: Krebstiere, Krebstieren, Krustentier
el: καρκινοειδή
eo: krustacoj
es: crustáceos
et: Vähilaadsed, koorikloomad
eu: Krustazeo
fa: سخت‌پوستان
fr: crustacés, crustacé
ga: crústach, crústaigh
gl: Crustáceos
he: סרטנאים
hi: क्रस्टेशिया
hr: rakovi
hu: Rákok, rákfélék
hy: խեցգետնանմաններ
id: Krustasea
io: Krustaceo
is: Krabbadýr
it: crostacei
ja: 甲殻類
ka: კიბოსნაირნი
kk: Шаянтәрізділер
ko: 갑각류
ku: Kevjal
kw: Krestennek
ky: Рак сымалдар
la: Crustacea
lb: Kriibsen
li: Krabechtige
lt: vėžiagyviai
lv: vēžveidīgie
mk: ракови
ml: ക്രസ്റ്റേഷ്യൻ
ms: Krustasea
mt: krustaċej
my: ကနန်း၊ ရေသတ္တဝါ
nb: krepsdyr
nl: schaaldieren, schaaldier
nn: Krepsdyr
nv: Chʼosh bikágí dantłʼizí
oc: Crustacèu
pa: پوستى ژوي
pl: skorupiaki, skorupiak, skorupiaków
pt: crustáceos
qu: Qaraqruyuwa
ro: crustacee
ru: ракообразные
sh: Rakovi
sk: kôrovce
sl: raki
sr: ракови
sv: kräftdjur
sw: Gegereka
ta: ஓடுடைய இனங்கள்
th: ครัสเตเชียน
tl: Krustasyano
tr: Kabuklular
uk: ракоподібні
ur: قشریات
uz: Qisqichbaqasimonlar
vi: động vật giáp xác
zh: 甲壳亚门

en: crab, crab meat, crabmeat
af: Krap
ak: ɔkɔtɔ
am: ሠርጣን
ar: سرطان
az: Yengəclər
be: крабы
bg: рак, раци
bn: কাঁকড়া
br: Krank
ca: Cranc
cs: Krabi
cy: Cranc
da: Krabbe
de: Krabbe, Krabben
el: Κάβουρας
eo: Krabo
es: Braquiuro, cangrejo, cangrejos
et: Krabilised
eu: Karramarro
fa: خرچنگ
fi: taskurapu, taskuravut
fo: Krabbadýr
fr: crabe, crabes
ga: Portán
gd: Partan
gl: Cangrexo
gn: Guaiamu
gu: કરચલો
gv: કરચલો
he: סרטנים קצרי בטן
hi: केकड़ा
hr: rakova, rakovice
ht: Krab
hu: Rövidfarkú rákok
hy: խաչափառներ
ia: cancere
id: Kepiting
io: Krabo
is: Krabbar
it: Granchio
ja: カニ, かに
jv: Kepithing
ka: ცხრაფეხები
kk: Таңқы шаян
kn: ಏಡಿ
ko: 게
ky: Крабдар
la: Brachyura, Cancer
lt: Krabas
lv: Krabji
mg: Foza
mk: Краба
ml: ഞണ്ട്
mr: खेकडा
ms: Ketam
my: ကဏန်း
nb: Krabber
ne: गँगटो
nl: krab, krabben
nn: Krabbe
nv: Chʼosh bikágí ntłʼizí
oc: Cranc
pa: ਕੇਕੜਾ
pl: kraby, krab, kraba, krabów, krabowy, krabowe, krabowa
ps: چنگاښ
pt: Caranguejo
ro: Crab
ru: крабы
sh: Kraba
sk: Krab
sl: Rakovice
sn: Gakanje
sr: краба
su: Keuyeup
sv: Krabbor
sw: Kaa
ta: நண்டு
te: పీత
tg: Крилово
th: ปู
tr: Yengeç
uk: краби
ur: کیکڑا
vi: Phân thứ bộ Cua
xh: Nonkala
za: Baeu
zh: 螃蟹
zu: Inkalankala

en: snow crab, snow crab meat, snow crabmeat
xx: Chionoecetes opilio

en: crab extract
de: Krabbenaroma
es: extracto de cangrejo
fr: extrait de crabe
hr: ekstrakt rakova
it: estratto di granchio
sv: krabbextrakt

en: crab flavour
bg: ароматизант от раци
ca: aroma de cranc
da: krabbe aroma
es: aroma de cangrejo
fi: rapuaromi
fr: arôme crabe
hr: okus rakova
it: sapore di granchio
nl: krabaroma
pt: aroma de caranguejo
sv: krabbarom

en: edible crab, brown crab
bg: ядивни раци
cs: krab německý
de: Taschenkrebs
es: Buey de mar
fi: Isotaskurapu
fr: Crabe dormeur, Dormeur, Poupard, Poupart, Tourteau, Crabe-de-lune, Poing-clos, Clos-poing, Ouvet
hr: jestivi rak
hu: Nagy tarisznyarák
it: granchio commestibile
la: Cancer pagurus
nl: Noordzeekrab
nn: taskekrabbe
pt: Caranguejola
ru: Большой сухопутный краб
sk: Krab piesočný
sv: Krabbtaska

en: crab substitute
hr: imitacija rakovice
it: surimi di granchio

en: crayfish
ar: جراد البحر
ca: Cranc de riu
cs: rak
de: Krebs
el: Καραβίδα
eo: Kankro
es: cangrejo de río, cancrej
fa: خارچنگ
fi: Ravut
fr: écrevisse, écrevisses
ga: Gliomach fionnuisce
gd: Giomach uisge
gl: Cangrexo de río
he: סרטני נהרות
hr: račići
ht: Ekrevis
hy: Գետային խեցգետիններ
id: Lobster air tawar
io: Kankro
is: Vatnakrabbar
ja: ザリガニ
kk: Өзен шаяны
ko: 가재
la: Astacologia
ms: Udang krai
nb: ferskvannskreps
nl: rivierkreeft
nv: Tooh chʼoshtsoh bíláshgaantsohí
oc: Escaravissa
pl: rak, raki, raka
pt: lagostim
qu: Apanqura
ru: речные раки
sv: Kräftor
th: เครย์ฟิช
tr: Kerevit
uk: річкові раки
vi: Tôm hùm đất
wa: Grevesse
zh: 淡水龙虾

en: red swamp crayfish, Procambarus clarkii
af: Rooimoeraskreef, Procambarus clarkii
ar: إستاكوزا المستنقعات الحمراء, Procambarus clarkii
ca: cranc de riu americà, Procambarus clarkii
cs: rak červený, Procambarus clarkii
de: Roter Amerikanischer Sumpfkrebs, Procambarus clarkii
eo: Luiziana kankro, Procambarus clarkii
es: Cangrejo de río americano, Procambarus clarkii
eu: Ibai-karramarro gorri, Procambarus clarkii
fi: punarapu, Procambarus clarkii
fr: Écrevisse de Louisiane, Procambarus clarkii
gl: Cangrexo de río americano, Procambarus clarkii
hr: crveni močvarni rak
hu: Kaliforniai vörösrák, Procambarus clarkii
it: Gambero killer, Procambarus clarkii
ja: アメリカザリガニ, Procambarus clarkii
ko: 미국가재, Procambarus clarkii
la: Procambarus clarkii
nl: Rode rivierkreeft, Procambarus clarkii
pt: Lagostim vermelho da Luisiana, Procambarus clarkii
sk: Rak americký, Procambarus clarkii
sv: Röd sumpkräfta, Procambarus clarkii
th: กุ้งแดง, Procambarus clarkii
zh: 克氏原螯虾, Procambarus clarkii

en: lobster, lobster meat
ar: همار, كركند
be: Амары
bg: омар, омари
bn: গলদা
ca: Nefròpid
cs: humrovití
da: hummer
de: Hummer
el: Αστακός
eo: Omaro
es: langosta, bogavante
et: Homaar
eu: Misera
fa: شاه‌میگو
fi: hummeri, hummerit
fo: Hummari
fr: homard, homards
ga: Gliomach
gd: Giomach
gl: Nefrópidos, Lumbrigante
he: לובסטר
hi: झींगा मछली
hr: hlap
ht: Oma
hy: Օմարներ
id: Lobster
io: Homardo
is: Humrar
it: Omaro
ja: ロブスター, オマールエビ
jv: Lobster
ka: ჰომარი
kk: Омарлар, Омар шаяны
ko: 바닷가재
ku: Kevjalk
ky: Омарлар
la: Nephropidae, Homarus
lb: Homard
lt: Omaras
lv: omāri
mk: јастози
ml: കൊഞ്ച്
ms: Udang karang
my: ကျောက်ပုဇွန်
nb: Hummere
ne: झिङ्गे माछा
nl: zeekreeften
nn: Hummar
nv: Chʼoshtsoh bíláshgaantsohí, Chʼoshtsoh bíláshgaantsohí daadánígíí
oc: Ligombau
pa: كركند
pl: homary, homar, homara
pt: Lavagante
ro: Homar
ru: омары
sh: Nefropidi, Hlapovi
sv: hummer
ta: கல் இறால்
te: ఎండ్రకాయ
th: ล็อบสเตอร์
tl: Ulang
tr: Istakoz
uk: Омар
ur: کَر کند
vi: Họ Tôm hùm càng
zh: 海螯蝦科

en: European lobster, common lobster, Homarus gammarus
bg: европейски омар, Homarus gammarus
cs: humr evropský, Homarus gammarus
de: Europäischer Hummer, Homarus gammarus
et: Euroopa homaar, Homarus gammarus
fi: Euroopanhummeri, Homarus gammarus
fr: homard européen, Homarus gammarus
ga: Gliomach Eorpach, Homarus gammarus
hr: europski jastog
hu: Európai homár, Homarus gammarus
is: Evrópskur Humar, Homarus gammarus
it: gambero europeo, Homarus gammarus
la: Homarus gammarus
lt: Europinis omaras, Homarus gammarus
nl: Europese kreeft, Homarus gammarus
nn: Europeisk hummar, Homarus gammarus
pl: homar europejski, Homarus gammarus
ro: Homar european, Homarus gammarus
ru: Европейский омар, Homarus gammarus
sh: Hlap, Homarus gammarus
sl: Evropski jastog, Homarus gammarus
sv: Europeisk hummer, Homarus gammarus
zh: 歐洲螯龍蝦, Homarus gammarus

en: American lobster, Homarus americanus
bn: আমেরিকান গলদা চিংড়ি, Homarus americanus
ca: llamàntol americà, Homarus americanus
cs: humr americký, Homarus americanus
da: amerikansk hummer, Homarus americanus
de: Amerikanischer Hummer, Homarus americanus
el: αμερικανικός αστακός, Homarus americanus
es: Langosta americana, Homarus americanus
et: Ameerika homaar, Homarus americanus
fa: شاه‌میگوی آمریکایی, Homarus americanus
fi: amerikanhummeri, Homarus americanus
fr: homard américain, Homarus americanus
he: לובסטר אמריקני, Homarus americanus
hi: अमेरिकी झींगा मछली, Homarus americanus
hr: američki jastog, američki hlap
id: Lobster amerika, Homarus americanus
it: Astice americano, Homarus americanus
ka: ამერიკული ასთაკვი, Homarus americanus
la: Homarus americanus
lt: Amerikinis omaras, Homarus americanus
mn: Amerikansk hummer, Homarus americanus
nn: Amerikansk hummar, Homarus americanus
or: ଆମେରିକୀୟ ଚିଙ୍ଗୁଡି, Homarus americanus
pa: ਅਮਰੀਕੀ ਲਾਬਸਟਰ, Homarus americanus
pl: Homar amerykański, Homarus americanus
ru: американский омар, Homarus americanus
sh: Američki hlap, Homarus americanus
sq: karavidhe amerikane, Homarus americanus
sv: Amerikansk hummer, Homarus americanus
ur: امریکی لابسٹر, Homarus americanus
vi: Tôm hùm Mỹ, Homarus americanus
zh: 美洲螯龍蝦, Homarus americanus

fr: pulpe de homard
de: Hummerfleisch
fi: hummerin liha

fr: bouillon de homard
de: Hummerbouillon
sv: hummerfond

en: spiny lobster, langustas, langouste, rock lobsters
ar: كركند شائك
az: Lanqustlar
bg: Гърбати омари
br: Grilh-mor
ca: Palinurus
cs: langustovití
de: Langusten
eo: Palinuro
es: langosta rosada
eu: Otarrain
fa: شاه‌میگوی تیغی
fi: langusti, langustit
fr: langouste rouge, langouste
ga: Gliomach spíonach
he: לובסטרים קוצניים
hr: jastog
hu: Európai languszta
io: Langusto
it: aragosta mediterranea
ja: イセエビ科
ka: ლანგუსტისებრნი
ko: 닭새우과
la: Palinuridae
lb: Langusten
mk: лангусти
nl: langoesten, langoest
nv: Táłtłʼááh chʼoshtsoh bideeneezí
pa: کریفش
pl: langusta, langusty
pt: Lagosta
qu: Langusta
ro: Langustă
ru: настоящие лангусты
sh: Jastog
sr: Лангуст
sv: Europeisk langust
th: กุ้งมังกร
vi: Tôm rồng
zh: 棘刺龍蝦

en: Caribbean spiny lobster, Panulirus argus
bg: карибски гръбначен омар, Panulirus argus
de: Karibik-Languste, Panulirus argus
fi: karibianlangusti, Panulirus argus
fr: Langouste blanche, Panulirus argus
hr: karipski jastog
it: aragosta spinosa caraibica
la: Panulirus argus, Panulirue argus
zh: 眼斑龍蝦, Panulirus argus

en: Norway lobster, Nephrops norvegicus
az: Norveç omarı, Nephrops norvegicus
be: Нарвежскі амар, Nephrops norvegicus
bg: норвежки омар, Nephrops norvegicus
br: Grilh-traezh, Nephrops norvegicus
ca: escamarlà, Nephrops norvegicus
da: Jomfruhummer, Nephrops norvegicus
de: Kaisergranat, Norwegischer Hummer, Nephrops norvegicus
el: Σκάμπι, Nephrops norvegicus
es: Cigala, Nephrops norvegicus
eu: Zigala, Nephrops norvegicus
fa: شاه‌میگوی نروژی, Nephrops norvegicus
fi: Keisarihummeri, Nephrops norvegicus
fo: Jómfrúhummari, Nephrops norvegicus
fr: Langoustine commune, langoustines, langoustine, Nephrops norvegicus
gl: Cigala, Nephrops norvegicus
hr: škamp, Nephrops norvegicus
is: Leturhumar, Nephrops norvegicus
it: Scampi, Scampo, Nephrops norvegicus
ja: ヨーロッパアカザエビ, Nephrops norvegicus
ko: 스캄피, Nephrops norvegicus
la: Nephrops norvegicus
nb: Sjøkreps, Nephrops norvegicus
nl: Noorse kreeft, Nephrops norvegicus
nn: Sjøkreps, Nephrops norvegicus
pl: homarzec, Nephrops norvegicus
ro: Langustină, Nephrops norvegicus
ru: Норвежский омар, Nephrops norvegicus
sh: Škamp, Nephrops norvegicus
sv: Havskräfta, Nephrops norvegicus
zh: 挪威海螯蝦, Nephrops norvegicus

en: lobster flavour
de: Hummer-Aroma
es: aroma de langosta
hr: okus jastoga
it: sapore di aragosta